Washington statutes.
RCW 15.24.015

Commission—Purpose.

The commission exists primarily for the benefit of the people of the state of Washington and its economy. The legislature hereby charges the commission, with oversight by the director, to speak on behalf of the Washington state government with regard to apples and apple-related issues.

[ 2004 c 178 s 1.]